Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 58. Public Weighmasters.

§ 3.2-5800.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Public weighing,”
means the weighing for any person, upon request, of property, produce, commodities, or articles other than those that the weigher or his employer, or any, is either buying or selling.

“Vehicle”
means any device in, upon, or by which any property, produce, commodity, or article is or may be transported or drawn.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-709.1, 3-709.17; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-970, 3.1-986; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5801.
Commissioner to adopt regulations.

The Commissioner may adopt regulations he deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.2; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-971; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5802.
Qualifications of licensed public weighmasters.

A citizen of the United States or a person who has been lawfully admitted for permanent residence, and is not less than 18 years of age, of good moral character, and who has the ability to weigh accurately and to make correct weight certificates, and who has received from the Commissioner a license as a licensed public weighmaster shall be authorized to act as a licensed public weighmaster.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.3; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-972; 1972, c. 824; 1985, c. 24; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5803.
Application for license.

Application for a license as a licensed public weighmaster shall be made upon a form provided by the Commissioner and the application shall furnish evidence that the applicant has the qualifications required by §

3.2-5802

.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.4; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-973; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5804.
Determining qualifications of applicant; granting of license; record of applications and licenses.

The Commissioner may adopt guidelines for determining the qualifications of the applicant for a license as a licensed public weighmaster. He may pass upon the qualifications of the applicant upon the basis of the information supplied in the application, or he may examine such applicant orally or in writing or both for the purpose of determining his qualifications. He shall grant licenses as licensed public weighmasters to such applicants as may be found to possess the qualifications required by §

3.2-5802

of this chapter. The Commissioner shall keep a record of all such applications and of all licenses issued thereon.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.5; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-974; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5805.
Licenses and renewal fees.

Before the issuance of any license as a licensed public weighmaster, or any renewal thereof, the applicant shall pay to the Commissioner a fee of $10. Such fees shall be deposited with the State Treasurer to be credited to a fund to be used by the Commissioner for the administration of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.6; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-975; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5806.
Issuance of limited licenses to certain public officers and employees.

The Commissioner may, upon request and without charge, issue a limited license as a licensed public weighmaster to any qualified officer or employee of a city or county of the Commonwealth or of a state commission, board, institution, or agency, authorizing such officer or employee to act as a licensed public weighmaster only within the scope of his official employment in the case of an officer or employee of a city or county or only for and on behalf of the state commission, board, institution, or agency in the case of an officer or employee thereof.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.7; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-976; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5807.
Expiration of licenses; applications for renewal.

Each license as licensed public weighmaster shall be issued to expire on December 31 of the calendar year for which it is issued. Any such license shall be valid through January 31 of the next ensuing calendar year or until issuance of the renewal license, whichever event first occurs, if the holder thereof shall have filed a renewal application with the Commissioner on or before December 15 of the year for which the current license was issued. Renewal applications shall be in such form as the Commissioner shall prescribe.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.8; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-977; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5808.
Oath and seal of licensed public weighmaster; Commonwealth not obligated to pay compensation.

Each licensed public weighmaster shall, before entering upon his duties, make oath to execute faithfully his duties. The issuance of a license as licensed public weighmaster shall not obligate the Commonwealth to pay to the licensee any compensation for his services as a licensed public weighmaster. Each licensed public weighmaster shall, at his own expense, provide himself with an impression seal. His name and the words “Commonwealth of Virginia” shall be inscribed around the outer margin of the seal and the words “licensed public weighmaster” shall appear in the center thereof. The seal shall be impressed upon each weight certificate issued by a licensed public weighmaster.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.9; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-978; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5809.
Form of weight certificate and information to be stated thereon; weight certificate as evidence.

The Commissioner shall prescribe the form of weight certificate to be used by a licensed public weighmaster. The weight certificate shall state the date of issuance, the kind of property, produce, commodity, or article weighed, the name of the declared owner or agent of the owner or of the consignee of the material weighed, the accurate weight of the material weighed, the means by which the material was being transported at the time it was weighed, and such other available information as may be necessary to distinguish or identify the property, produce, commodity, or article from others of like kind. Such weight certificate when so made and properly signed and sealed shall be prima facie evidence of the accuracy of the weights shown.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.10; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-979; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5810.
Entries on weight certificate.

A licensed public weighmaster shall not enter on a weight certificate issued by him any weight values but those he has personally determined, and he shall make no entries on a weight certificate issued by some other person. A weight certificate shall be so prepared as to show clearly what weight or weights were actually determined. If the certificate form provides for the entry of gross, tare, and net weights, in any case in which only the gross, the tare, or the net weight is determined by the weighmaster he shall strike through or otherwise cancel the printed entries for the weights not determined or computed. If gross and tare weights are shown on a weight certificate and both of these were not determined on the same scale and on the day for which the certificate is dated, the weighmaster shall identify on the certificate the scale used for determining each weight and the date of each determination.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.11; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-980; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5811.
Only suitable, tested and approved weighing devices to be used.

When making a weight determination as provided for by this chapter a licensed public weighmaster shall use a weighing device that is of a type suitable for the weighing of the amount and kind of material to be weighed, and that has been tested and approved for use by a weights and measures officer of the Commonwealth within a period of 12 months immediately preceding the date of the weighing.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.12; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-981; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5812.
Capacity of scales not to be exceeded; determining gross or tare weight of vehicle or combination of vehicles.

A licensed public weighmaster shall not use any scale to weigh a load the value of which exceeds the nominal or rated capacity of the scale. When the gross or tare weight of any vehicle or combination of vehicles is to be determined, the weighing shall be performed upon a scale having a platform of sufficient size to accommodate such vehicle or combination of vehicles fully, completely, and as one entire unit. If a combination of vehicles must be broken up into separate units in order to be weighed as prescribed herein, each such separate unit shall be entirely disconnected before weighing and a separate weight certificate shall be issued for each such separate unit.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.13; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-982; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5813.
Copies of weight certificates to be retained and kept open for inspection.

A licensed public weighmaster shall keep and preserve for at least one year, or for such longer period as may be specified in the regulations authorized to be issued for the enforcement of this chapter, a legible copy of each weight certificate issued by him, which copies shall be open at all reasonable times for inspection by any weights and measures officer of the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.14; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-983; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5814.
Weight certificates issued by weighmasters in other states.

Whenever in any other state that licenses public weighmasters, there is statutory authority for the recognition and acceptance of the weight certificates issued by licensed weighmasters of the Commonwealth, the Commissioner is authorized to recognize and accept the weight certificates of the other state.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.15; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-984; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5815.
Certain persons permitted but not required to obtain licenses.

The following persons shall not be required but shall be permitted to obtain licenses as licensed public weighmasters: (i) a weights and measures officer when acting within the scope of his official duties; (ii) a person weighing property, produce, commodities, or articles that he or his employers, if any, is either buying or selling; and (iii) a person weighing property, produce, commodities, or articles in conformity with the requirements of federal statutes or the statutes of his state relative to warehousemen or processors.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.16; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-985; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5816.
Certain acts forbidden to persons not licensed as public weighmasters.

No person shall assume the title “licensed public weighmaster,” or any title of similar import, perform the duties or acts to be performed by a licensed public weighmaster under this chapter, hold himself out as a licensed public weighmaster, issue any weight certificate, ticket, memorandum, or statement for which a fee is charged or engage in the full-time or part-time business of public weighing, unless he holds a valid license as a licensed public weighmaster.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.17; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-986; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5817.
Suspension or revocation of license.

The Commissioner is authorized to suspend or revoke the license of any licensed public weighmaster: (i) when he is satisfied, after a hearing upon 10 days’ notice to the licensee, that the said licensee has violated any provision of this chapter or of any regulation of the Commissioner affecting licensed public weighmasters; or (ii) when a licensed public weighmaster has been convicted in any appropriate court of violating any provision of this chapter or of any regulation issued under authority of this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.18; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-987; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-5818.
Requesting false weighing or false weight certificate; issuance of weight certificate by unlicensed person.

Any person who requests a licensed public weighmaster to weigh any property, produce, commodity, or article falsely or incorrectly, or who requests a false or incorrect weight certificate, or any person who issues a weight certificate simulating the weight certificate prescribed in this chapter and who is not a licensed public weighmaster, is guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor; and upon a second or subsequent conviction such person is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.19; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-988; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-5819.
Falsification or presealing of weight certificate by licensed weighmaster; delegation of authority to unlicensed person.

Any licensed public weighmaster who falsifies a weight certificate, or who delegates his authority to any person not licensed as a licensed public weighmaster, or who preseals a weight certificate with his official seal before performing the act of weighing, is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.20; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-989; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 3.2-5820.
Penalty for violation of chapter.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto for which no specific penalty has been provided is guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-709.21; 1962, c. 126; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-990; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.